California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(b) Any funds not used in carrying out Section 78271 shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon the establishment of the commission, the commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out Section 78271 and for any legal expenses and other costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [78285. - 78292.]

78285.

(a) The commission shall establish the assessment for the following marketing year not later than January 1 of each year, or as soon thereafter as possible. The commission shall adopt bylaws which establish the date for payment of the assessment.

(b) The assessment shall not exceed one cent ($0.01) per pound of all sales of asparagus by producers in the marketing year.

(c) The handler shall deduct the producer assessment from amounts paid by him or her to the producer and shall be a trustee of these funds until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission. 

(d) A fee greater than the amount specified in subdivision (b) shall not be charged unless approved by the vote specified in Section 78271.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78286.

This chapter does not apply to any person who grows asparagus only for his or her own home use or who is not a producer. However, any such person who markets asparagus shall file an affidavit with the commission establishing that the person grows less than five acres of asparagus. The commission shall then determine whether the affidavit should be approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78287.

Every handler shall keep a complete and accurate record of all asparagus handled with the name of the producer whose asparagus was handled. The records shall be in simple form and contain information as the commission shall prescribe. The records shall be retained by the handler for two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78288.

(a) The commission may specify the conditions under which proprietary information obtained from producers may be disclosed. Otherwise, all proprietary information obtained by the commission or the secretary from producers is confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter.

(b) Information on volume shipments, product value, and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information that the commission requires that gives only totals, but excludes individual producer information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78289.

Any assessment which is levied pursuant to this chapter is a personal debt of every producer so assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78290.

Every handler shall be personally liable for the payment of collected assessments to the commission. A failure by a handler to collect the assessment shall not exempt the handler from liability and shall not relieve any person subject to this chapter from the obligation to pay the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78291.

Any producer or handler who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, pay 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78292.

If the handler is a corporation, all of the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for failure to collect or make payment of assessments to which a corporate handler may be subject pursuant to this chapter shall include identical liability upon each individual director or officer of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 171.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [78295. - 78298.]

78295.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Refuse to render a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) Furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission. 

(c) When engaged in the handling of asparagus, to fail or refuse to furnish the commission, or its duly authorized agents, information concerning the names and addresses of persons from whom the asparagus have been received and the quantity so received.

(d) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78296.

The commission shall adopt procedures to grant individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission or before a committee of the commission designated for this purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 172.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78297.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and for obtaining injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments or the intentional submission of false information to the commission. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of that part, except that the showing of irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law specified in Sections 526 and 527 is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business involving asparagus until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, it may receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78298.

The suspension or termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability which has arisen or which may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [78300. - 78305.]

78300.

From January 1, 1995, to December 30, 1995, inclusive, the commission shall conduct a referendum among the producers to determine whether the operations of this chapter shall be approved and continued in effect. There is a favorable vote under this chapter if the secretary determines from the referendum that a majority of the eligible producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operations of this chapter. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given, the secretary shall so certify and this chapter shall remain effective. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, the secretary shall so certify and declare the operations of this chapter suspended on December 31, 1995. Thereupon, operation of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 78304. No bond or security shall be required for this referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78301.

Following a favorable referendum conducted prior to December 31, 1995, the commission shall conduct a referendum every fifth year thereafter, unless a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition filed pursuant to this article. In that case, the referendum shall be held pursuant to procedures provided in Section 78300 every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78302.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the membership of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing year.

(b) The secretary shall, upon receipt of the recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with the secretary requesting a suspension signed by not less than 20 percent of the producers by number who produced not less than 20 percent of the volume of asparagus in the immediately preceding marketing year, hold a referendum among the producers to determine if the operations of the commission shall be suspended. However, the secretary shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows, by a preponderance of evidence, that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes.

(c) The secretary shall establish a referendum period that shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. The secretary shall suspend the operation of this chapter if the secretary finds that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary have participated in the referendum and either one of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting marketed a majority of the total quantity of asparagus in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of asparagus in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

78303.

(a) The secretary shall terminate the commission at the end of the then current marketing year if the secretary finds that the termination of the commission is requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible producers that produce at least 51 percent of the total quantity of asparagus.

(b) The person or persons originating the request shall file a written notice with the secretary in a manner that establishes the date the request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name from the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the secretary.

(c) The signatures on the petition requesting the termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall specify his or her place of business in a manner that will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(d) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention to terminate the commission. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 175.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78304.

After the effective date of suspension, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and any and all funds remaining held by the commission and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing year. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to these persons, any funds remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate program conducted by the University of California or the California State University, another state agency, or a federal agency which deals with the purposes of this chapter. If no such program exists, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

78305.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers whose names and addresses are on file with the commission and to the appropriate policy committees in both the Assembly and Senate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 23. California Seafood Council [78401. - 78588.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title and Definitions [78401. - 78415.]

78401.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “California Seafood Marketing, Research, and Development Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78402.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78403.

“Council” means the California Seafood Council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78404.

“Exporter” means any person who is engaged, or who works for a person who is engaged, in the export to a foreign nation or nations of seafood landed in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78405.

“Fiscal year” means from April 1 of a year to March 31, inclusive, of the next succeeding year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78406.

“Fisherman” means any person licensed to commercially harvest fish or shellfish pursuant to Sections 7850 to 7852, inclusive, of the Fish and Game Code who lands any species of fish or shellfish for commercial purposes included in, and not excepted from, a fishery, as defined in Section 78407, or who is the registered owner or lessee of a vessel that is used to land any species of fish or shellfish included in, and not excepted from, a fishery, as defined in Section 78407, if the registered owner or lessee has a financial interest in the fish or shellfish and pays or has assessments paid on his or her behalf.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78407.

“Fishery” means:

(a) Each species or group of fish or shellfish harvested in ocean waters landed in California that are treated as a unit for purposes of research, development, promotion, or marketing, except abalone, anchovy, dungeness crab, herring and herring roe, pink shrimp, salmon, sea urchins, all fish or shellfish collected for scientific experiment or aquaria, all fish classified as groundfish taken by use of trawl nets, and all tuna landed for canning in this state or for transshipment for canning in other states or nations.

(b) Any economic activity involving the harvesting, receiving, processing, manufacturing, or distributing of fish or shellfish described in, and not excepted by, subdivision (a) and products therefrom.

(c) Each species or group of fish or shellfish excepted by subdivision (a) or any other species of fish or shellfish landed in California after the addition of the fishery for that species of fish or shellfish pursuant to Section 78582.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78408.

“Handler” means any of the following:

(a) A processor engaged in the California fishery.

(b) A receiver engaged in the California fishery.

(c) A wholesaler engaged in the California fishery.

(d) An exporter engaged in the California fishery.

(e) A person is licensed or who works for any person who is licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8032 of the Fish and Game Code and engaged in the California commercial fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78409.

“Marketing association” means any commercial fishermen’s organization established on either a local, county, or statewide level, incorporated in this state, to enable fishermen to collectively negotiate and issue orders and agreements with receivers for the purchase of their catches, or to otherwise engage in activities permitted of agricultural cooperatives, and whose members are involved in the California commercial fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78410.

“Person” has the same meaning as that term is defined by Section 38.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78411.

“Processor” means any person who is licensed or who works for any person who is licensed pursuant to Section 8034 of the Fish and Game Code and engaged in the California commercial fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78412.

“Receiver” means any person who is licensed or who works for a person who is licensed pursuant to Section 8033 of the Fish and Game Code and engaged in the California commercial fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78413.

“Wholesaler” means any person who is licensed or who works for a person who is licensed pursuant to Section 8035 of the Fish and Game Code and engaged in the California commercial fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78414.

“Ex-vessel price” means the price paid to fishermen for fish or shellfish by receivers at the point of first sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78415.

“Sponsor” means a person or company that is not a member of the council but who supports and wishes to contribute to programs established by the director on behalf of the council for a specified voluntary contribution and benefit, as authorized by Section 78563.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1172, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [78425. - 78430.]

78425.

The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purposes of protecting and furthering the public health and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78426.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the fisheries of this state are affected with a public interest, in that, among other things:

(a) The harvesting, processing, manufacturing, and distributing of fishery products constitute a paramount industry of this state, which not only provides substantial and required revenues for the state and its political subdivisions and employment and a means of livelihood for many residents, but which also furnishes essential foods that are vital to the public health and welfare.

(b) It is through commercial fishermen and receivers that more than 90 percent of this state’s citizens have access to these healthful foods which are resources that belong to all of the residents of the state and country.

(c) The stabilization, maintenance, and expansion of the California commercial fisheries, and of the state, nationwide, and foreign markets for its products are necessary to ensure the consuming public access to, and an adequate supply of foods which are indispensable in, a proper human diet, to protect, for the state and its political subdivisions, a necessary source of tax revenue, to provide and maintain an adequate standard of living for a segment of the population of this state, to maintain proper wage scales for those engaged in the California commercial fisheries, and to maintain existing employment.

(d) The essentiality of fish, low in fat and calories, to proper human nutrition and to the maintenance of a high level of public health is such as to require that the public be made thoroughly aware thereof, and be protected against misrepresentation and deception, through the dissemination of accurate and scientific information relative to the healthful qualities of fishery and seafood products, their various classifications and the food values and industrial and medicinal uses thereof, the methods, care, and precautions necessary to their proper harvesting, processing, manufacturing, and distributing, and the necessary costs and expenses thereof, and the necessity and desirability on the part of the public of using and consuming fishery products of the highest standards of quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78427.

The Legislature declares that the purposes of this chapter are as follows:

(a) To enable the seafood industry, with the aid of the state, to educate the public on the nutritional and economic value and importance of California seafood and the fishing industry and to develop, maintain, and expand the state, nationwide, and foreign markets for seafood products that are harvested, processed, manufactured, sold, or distributed in this state.

(b) In aid, but not in limitation, of the purposes in subdivision (a), to authorize and enable the secretary to formulate and effectuate, directly or in cooperation with other agencies, organizations, and other instrumentalities , sales stimulation and consumer or other educational and research programs, designed to inform the public about California seafood and to increase the use and consumption of seafood and seafood products landed in California.

(c) To promote the continued viability of fisheries and thereby promote continued access to California’s seafood resources.

(d) To present facts to and negotiate with state, federal, and other agencies on matters that affect the availability and marketing of California seafood.

(e) To provide funds for the administration and enforcement of this chapter by the collection of mandatory fees in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78428.

This chapter shall be liberally construed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78429.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78430.

A violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [78450. - 78452.]

78450.

The director shall administer and enforce this chapter, and may exercise any of the administrative powers which are conferred by Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code upon a head of a department.

In order to effectuate the declared purposes of this chapter, the director may contract to carry out the declared intent and purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78451.

Upon recommendation by the council, the director may adopt, consistent with this chapter, any regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this chapter necessary to carry out the purposes and attain the objectives of this chapter. However, the director shall not engage in any seafood education, research, or promotion activity without the approval of a majority of the voting members of the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78452.

Upon the adoption of any regulations under this chapter, a copy of the regulations shall be posted on a bulletin board which shall be maintained by the director in his or her office. The director shall mail a copy of the notice of the adoption of the regulations to commercial fishermen and every receiver that is directly affected by the regulations whose name and address is on file in the office of the director and to every person who files in the office of the director a written request for that notice. No regulation shall become effective until five days after the date of that posting and mailing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. California Seafood Council [78475. - 78496.]

78475.

There is in the State of California the California Seafood Council. The council shall be composed of not less than 11 voting members and their alternates, and six nonvoting members. The number of voting members shall be adjusted in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 78476. The council may include nonvoting, ex officio members representing interests allied to California’s fishing industry upon recommendation of the executive committee of the council and approval by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78476.

The voting members of the council shall be appointed by the secretary, giving due consideration to proper geographic distribution. The voting members shall include:

(a) Four receivers or processors or their representatives, and their alternates.

(b) Five fishermen who are licensed commercial fishing vessel owners, commercial fishermen or their representatives, and their alternates. The fishermen appointed pursuant to this subdivision shall each represent the users of one of the following types of fishing gear:

(1) Gill and trammel nets.

(2) Hook and line.

(3) Trawl nets.

(4) Round-haul nets.

(5) Traps.

(c) One representative of a handler who is an exporter or a wholesaler, and an alternate.

(d) One public member, and an alternate.

(e) One representative of fishermen and receivers, or his or her representative, and his or her alternate, for each fishery described in subdivision (c) of Section 78407, commencing with the favorable vote in a referendum relating to that fishery. If the species to be included is taken by one of the gear types specified in subdivision (b), such as “groundfish trawl nets,” the species and gear type shall be added to the list of fishing gear types in subdivision (b) by regulation adopted by the secretary. If the gear type is not specifically listed in subdivision (b), it shall be included in the list by regulation adopted by the secretary upon a favorable vote in a referendum, a request from the new gear group, and a recommendation by the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78477.

(a) If, pursuant to Section 78577, the receivers vote in favor of the council and the fishermen do not, the council shall be implemented with seven members and the number of fishermen representatives appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 78476 shall be reduced to one, and the alternate.

(b) If, pursuant to Section 78577, the fishermen vote in favor of the council and the receivers do not, the council shall be implemented with eight members and the number of receiver or processor representatives appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 78476 shall be reduced to one, and the alternate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78478.

(a) The fishermen and their alternates shall be selected from lists of nominees submitted by marketing associations and any organization deemed by the director to represent the majority of organized California commercial fishermen harvesting species of fish and shellfish included under this chapter and from nominations by individual fishermen.

(b) The receivers, processors, wholesalers, or exporters and their alternates shall be selected from lists of nominees submitted by an organization deemed by the director to represent the majority of those organized groups in the state, and from individual receivers, processors, wholesalers, and exporters.

(c) The public member and alternate shall be selected by the director from a list submitted by the receiver, handler, and fishermen members of the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78479.

The voting members of the council shall each be appointed to a three-year term, except that in the first year of the council, four members shall be appointed to one-year terms; four members shall be appointed to two-year terms; and three shall be appointed to three-year terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78480.

If, pursuant to Section 78577, either the fishermen or the receivers, but not both, vote in favor of the council, the voting members of the council shall each be appointed to a three-year term, except in the first year of the council when three members shall be appointed to one-year terms, three members shall be appointed to two-year terms, and the remaining members shall be appointed to three-year terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78481.

The term of office of a member of the council shall begin on April 1 and expire on March 31.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78482.

Any vacancy in the membership of the council which occurs during the unexpired term shall be filled by the director for the unexpired term from the eligible nominees. No council member or alternate shall serve more than two consecutive three-year terms. Service as an alternate does not disqualify a person to then serve two additional terms as a member, and a member who was appointed for a one-year or a two-year term may serve two additional three-year terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78483.

The director may remove any member of the council or alternate for cause, and, upon that removal, there is a vacancy which shall be filled in the manner provided in Section 78482.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78484.

The director shall give notice, not later than January 31 of each year, of the vacancies that will exist upon the expiration of terms on March 31, in writing, to all marketing associations and organizations deemed by the director to represent the majority of organized fishermen, or receivers, processors, wholesalers, and exporters, and shall issue any press releases and public statements requesting nominations that the director deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78485.

(a) The notice requesting nominations shall indicate that nominations shall be mailed to the director at his or her office in Sacramento and that the director will consider nominations received by mail postmarked no later than March 1. 

(b) Each nomination shall set forth all of the following information: 

(1) The name and address of the nominee. 

(2) Whether the nominee is being nominated as a member or alternate member. 

(3) The type of category for which the nominee is being nominated. 

(4) The list of qualifications and supporters, if any, for the nominee. 

(5) The name and address of the nominating association, organization, or individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 615, Sec. 2.   Effective October 8, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

78486.

One nonvoting member of the council may be appointed by the secretary to represent each of the following entities:

(a) The department.

(b) The Department of Fish and Game.

(c) The California Sea Grant Program.

(d) The State Department of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 225, Sec. 13.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

78487.

There is no fixed term for nonvoting members of the council. The agencies listed in Section 78486 may select an alternate for their representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78488.

A majority of the voting members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business, including the election of officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78489.

(a) The council shall select annually from its voting number, to serve at its pleasure, a president, vice president, and treasurer. The immediate past president shall serve as the president emeritus of the council.

(b) The president, vice president, treasurer, and president emeritus, together with three other voting members, selected annually by the council, shall constitute the executive committee of the council. The executive committee may exercise any powers of the council that the council delegates to the executive committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78490.

The council shall hold at least two regular meetings in each year at times and places that are fixed by the council. The council may meet in special meetings at any time and place at the call of the president or upon the written request of five members of the council. The executive committee may meet at any time and place at the call of the president or on call of a majority of the members of the executive committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78491.

The voting members of the council shall receive forty dollars ($40) per day per diem for each day spent in actual attendance at the meetings or on the business of the council and shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, as approved by the secretary. Nonvoting members shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses, as approved by the secretary, at the same rate as voting members if the agency they represent does not reimburse them for those expenses. Alternates shall be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses, as approved by the secretary, and shall receive per diem at the same rate as voting members for meetings which they attend. Any member may refuse to accept per diem or expenses, or any portion thereof, to which he or she is entitled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 726, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

78492.

No member of the council, except a member of the executive committee, shall receive per diem for more than seven days per month, except the chairperson, who may receive per diem for not more than 10 days per month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78493.

The director may require any employee or agent of the council to give a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company which is authorized to do business in this state, in favor of the director, in the sum, and containing any terms and conditions, that the director may prescribe. The cost of the fidelity bonds of employees or agents of the council shall be paid from the funds which are collected pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78494.

No member or employee of the council shall be held responsible individually to any person for liability on any contract or agreement of the council. All salaries, expenses, costs, obligations, and liabilities which arise out of the administration and enforcement of this chapter are payable only from funds which are collected pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

78495.
